Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.505

Fairness in lending act—Definitions.

As used in RCW 30A.04.505 through 30A.04.515:

(1) "Financial institution" means any bank, savings bank, credit union, mortgage company, or savings and loan association which operates or has a place of business in this state whether regulated by the state or federal government.

(2) "Particular type of loan" refers to a class of loans which is substantially similar with respect to the following:

(a) FHA, VA, or conventional loans;

(b) Uniform or nonuniform payment;

(c) Uniform or nonuniform rate of interest;

(d) Purpose; and

(e) The location of the real estate offered as security for the loan as being inside or outside of that financial institution's lending area.

(3) "Varying the terms of a loan" includes, but is not limited to the following practices:

(a) Requiring a greater down payment than is usual for the particular type of a loan involved;

(b) Requiring a shorter period of amortization than is usual for the particular type of loan involved;

(c) Charging a higher interest rate than is usual for the particular type of loan involved;

(d) A deliberate underappraisal of the value of the property offered as security.

[ 2014 c 37 s 143; 1977 ex.s. c 301 s 11. Formerly RCW 30.04.505.]